Hawaii statutes.
§182-15 Other use of surface of state
lands. Where mining leases are granted on state lands, the board may
reserve to the State the right to lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of the
surface of the lands embraced within the lease. The lease, sale, or other
disposal of the surface, if made, shall be subject to the rights of the holder
of the mining lease. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-15; HRS §182-15; am L
2016, c 220, §10]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next